Illinois, session 104th, HB3095.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Guardianship and Advocacy Act is amended by 5changing Section 14 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3955/14)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 714)7    Sec. 14. Each regional authority shall consist of at least 87 members and no more than the 9 members appointed by the 9Director, in accordance with this Section. Each regional 10authority shall include insofar as possible one professionally 11knowledgeable and broadly experienced employee or officer of a 12provider of each of the following services: mental health, 13developmental disabilities, and vocational rehabilitation. No 14other employee or officer of a service provider shall be 15appointed to a regional authority. In making appointments, the 16Director shall strive to ensure representation of minority 17groups and of eligible persons, and shall give due 18consideration to recommendations of persons and groups 19assisting eligible persons. The Director may remove for 20incompetence, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office any 21member of a regional authority. All actions taken by the 22Director to appoint or remove members shall be reported to the 23Commission at the next scheduled Commission meeting.   HB3095 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10813 SPS 20894 b1    Each regional authority shall annually elect a chairman 2and any other officers it deems necessary. Members of the 3regional authorities shall serve for a term of 3 years, except 4that the terms of the first appointees shall be as follows: 3 5members serving for a 1 year term; 3 members serving for a 2 6year term; and 3 members serving for a 3 year term. Assignment 7of terms of such first appointees shall be by lot. No member 8shall serve for more than 2 consecutive 3 year terms. A quorum 9shall consist of a majority of appointed members. Five members 10shall constitute a quorum.11    Vacancies in the regional authorities shall be filled in 12the same manner as original appointments.13    Members of the regional authorities shall serve without 14compensation but shall be reimbursed for actual expenses 15incurred in the performance of their duties.16    Each regional authority shall meet not less than once 17every 2 months. Meetings may also be held upon call of the 18Regional Chairman or upon written request of any 5 members of 19the regional authority.20(Source: P.A. 96-271, eff. 1-1-10.)